Idaho, session 2025, S1068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature that
this act shall codify a current education practice in Idaho that allows a
school district or public charter school to work with individual families
to provide at-home parent-supported instruction to a student and to provide
funds for education expenses. It is the intent of the Legislature that this
practice continues and that it is used by all school districts that choose to
use it. This act shall be known as the "Parent-Supported Instruction Act."
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1637, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1637. PARENT-SUPPORTED INSTRUCTION. (1) For purposes of this sec-
tion:
(a) "Alternative curriculum" means a curriculum or curricula chosen by
a parent for parent-supported instruction that is different, in whole
or in part, from the curriculum provided by the sponsoring school dis-
trict. The curriculum selected by a parent under this section is ex-
empted from sections 33-118A and 33-512A, Idaho Code.
(b) "Education savings account" means an expense account created and
funded by a sponsoring school district for parents of students partic-
ipating in the parent-supported instruction model to be used for eligi-
ble expenses.
(c) "Eligible expenses" means expenses relating to education, includ-
ing but not limited to the cost of the alternative curriculum in core
subjects required by the state, education supplies, and tutoring.
(d) "Eligible student" means a student who lives in the state of Idaho
who is qualified to attend an Idaho public school.
(e) "Learning pod" means two (2) or more families who are using the par-
ent-supported instruction model pooling resources for group instruc-
tion by a parent or tutor.
(f) "Parent" means a biological parent or legal guardian of an eligible
student.
(g) "Parent-supported instruction model" means an instruction model in
which a sponsoring school district assigns teachers to work with par-
ents who are providing some or all instruction to their eligible chil-


dren at home. In this model, the sponsoring school district provides
accountability measures such as required sampling of assignments. Stu-
dents participating in this model are required to take state-mandated
tests.
(h) "Sponsoring school district" means a public school district or pub-
lic charter school that sponsors a parent-supported instruction model
pursuant to this section.
(i) "Tutor" means a person who instructs an individual student or stu-
dents and who is not required to be a state-certified teacher.
(2) School districts and public charter schools may adopt a policy au-
thorizing the school district or public charter school to sponsor a parent-
supported instruction model pursuant to this section. Only school districts
or public charter schools that have adopted a policy for parent-supported
instruction may sponsor parent-supported instruction models under this sec-
tion.
(3) The amount of funds allocated to each education savings account
for students participating in parent-supported instruction shall be set
by the sponsoring school district in district policy. Sponsoring school
districts shall determine what qualifies as an eligible expense in district
policy. Sponsoring school districts may increase the pupil-teacher ratio
for students participating in parent-supported instruction models beyond
state-mandated levels as long as such students are performing at or above the
same level as the average public school student statewide not participating
in the parent-supported instruction model. A sponsoring school district may
contract with other school districts or public charter schools to provide
parent-supported instruction. The sponsoring school district retains re-
sponsibility for special education services.
(4) Students participating in parent-supported instruction pursuant
to this section shall be enrolled in the sponsoring school district for pur-
poses of calculating educational support program funds apportioned to the
sponsoring school district. A sponsoring school district shall receive full
per-student state funding for a student participating in parent-supported
instruction. Sponsoring school districts may use an educational service
provider to work directly with parents who may use technology, including the
internet and electronic devices, to provide parent-supported instruction
to students, provided that students shall take all tests required by the
state. Parents providing parent-supported instruction pursuant to this
section may elect to form a learning pod with other such parents and select an
agreed-upon curriculum for the participating students. A parent or a tutor
chosen by the parents shall instruct the learning pod.
(5) Parents with eligible children may apply to a sponsoring school
district to participate in a parent-supported instruction model. The time-
line for submission of applications to participate in a parent-supported
instruction model shall be set by the sponsoring school district. The appli-
cation shall include:
(a) The name and grade level of the student to be enrolled;
(b) Proof that the student is an eligible student pursuant to this sec-
tion;
(c) The curricula in English, math, science, and social studies chosen
by the parent; and


(d) Details regarding a student's need for use of the sponsoring school
district's transportation, playground, facilities, after-school ac-
tivities, special education, instruction in subjects other than those
taught in the parent-supported instruction model, or any other services
or issues identified by the sponsoring school district.
(6) The provisions of section 33-512D(3) and (4), Idaho Code, regard-
ing self-directed learner designations apply to a student participating in a
parent-supported instruction model pursuant to this section if such student
is at or above grade level based on the Idaho standards achievement test, the
Idaho reading indicator test, or any other school-approved assessments from
the previous year.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.